Hawaii statutes.
[§453D-14] Mental health counselor
prohibited from testifying in alimony and divorce actions. If both parties
to a marriage have obtained mental health counseling from a licensed mental
health counselor, the counselor shall be prohibited from testifying in an
alimony or divorce action concerning information acquired in the course of
mental health counseling. This section shall not apply to custody actions
whether or not part of a divorce proceeding. [L 2004, c 209, pt of §2; am L
2008, c 206, §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next